src/fst/morphology/ext-github_kristiank/data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-koirw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - koirõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asKoirõ'
    koirõ+N+Sg+Nom: koirõ
    koirõ+N+Pl+Nom: koirõd
    koirõ+N+Sg+Gen: koira
    koirõ+N+Pl+Gen: [koiri, koirije]
    koirõ+N+Sg+Par: [koira, koiraa]
    koirõ+N+Pl+Par: [koiri, koiritõ]
    koirõ+N+Sg+Ill: [koiraa, koirasõ]
    koirõ+N+Pl+Ill: [koiri, koirisõ]
    koirõ+N+Sg+Ine: koirõz
    koirõ+N+Pl+Ine: koiriz
    koirõ+N+Sg+Ela: koirõssõ
    koirõ+N+Pl+Ela: koirissõ
    koirõ+N+Sg+All: koirõllõ
    koirõ+N+Pl+All: koirillõ
    koirõ+N+Sg+Ade: koirõl
    koirõ+N+Pl+Ade: koiril
    koirõ+N+Sg+Abl: koirõltõ
    koirõ+N+Pl+Abl: koiriltõ
    koirõ+N+Sg+Tra: koirõssi
    koirõ+N+Pl+Tra: koirissi
    koirõ+N+Sg+Ter: koirassaa
    koirõ+N+Pl+Ter: koirissaa
    koirõ+N+Sg+Com: koiraka
    koirõ+N+Pl+Com: koirika
